Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2409.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-249.20, to read: START_STATUTE15-249.20. Arizona artificial intelligence education program; curriculum; academic credit A. The Arizona Artificial Intelligence Education Program is established within the Department of Education. The department shall administer the program and offer an artificial intelligence education course each summer in various locations throughout this state.  The course that is offered pursuant to this subsection is open to any resident of this state and must include at least the following: 1. A digital Hygiene and Civic Integrity curriculum that is designed to teach students how to navigate the digital world safely and with a critical eye.  The curriculum must include instruction on: (a) The principles of digital hygiene based on the monograph "Preventing the Misuse of Digital Influence:  The Development of SYstems for Preserving and Analyzing Potentially Harmful Online Content, and Why Such SYstems are Essential for Democracy". (b) The nature of algorithmic bias and the methods used by technology platforms to influence user behavior, including the Search Engine Manipulation Effect. (c) Best practices for protecting personal data and limiting online tracking by third parties. (d) Media literacy skills to identify misinformation and content that is generated by artificial intelligence. (e) General critical thinking skills. 2. An artificial Intelligence for Small Business and Entrepreneurship curriculum that includes practical, hands-on training on how to start or grow a small business.  The curriculum must include: (a) An overview of the Artificial Intelligence tools that are currently available for small businesses. (b) Instruction on how to use Artificial Intelligence for marketing and customer outreach, including personalized advertising and customer relationship management. (c) Instruction on how to use Artificial Intelligence to improve operational efficiency, including automating tasks, managing inventory and analyzing sales data. (d) An introduction to the ethical considerations of using Artificial Intelligence in a business context. B. The office of economic opportunity shall: 1. Develop the curriculum required by subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section. 2. Identify qualified volunteer instructors for the program from a diverse range of backgrounds, including successful business leaders, entrepreneurs from the TECHNOLOGY and start-up sectors and experienced educators. 3. Identify facilities in various locations throughout this state that the department may use to provide the course that is offered pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. A state agency, city, town, county, university, community college, public school, private school or other governmental budget unit of this state may allow uncompensated use of the agency's, city's, town's, county's, university's, community college's, public school's, private school's or budget unit's facilities by the department of education to provide the course that is offered pursuant to subsection A of this section. D. A public school, a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents or a community college as defined in section 15-1401 may award academic credit to any individual who completes the course that is offered pursuant to subsection A of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative findings and intent A. The legislature finds that: 1. The rapid advancement of artificial intelligence presents both unprecedented opportunities for economic growth and significant challenges to individual liberty and the integrity of our democratic processes. 2. Large technology platforms use sophisticated tools that are driven by artificial intelligence and that can shape the information environment and influence public opinion, a phenomenon documented by nonpartisan researchers. 3. Providing Arizona citizens with the knowledge to recognize and resist digital manipulation is essential to preserving a free and fair society. 4. Equipping Arizona's small business owners with the skills to use artificial intelligence will foster innovation, create jobs and ensure the long-term prosperity of our state. B. The legislature intends to establish a voluntary, statewide summer education program to empower all residents of this state with the principles of digital hygiene and the practical skills to use artificial intelligence for economic success. Sec. 3. Severability If a provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable. Sec. 4. Short title This act may be cited as the "Getting Arizona Ready for AI Act".